Utah statutes.
63B-7-503.   Highway revenue bond authorization.
It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(1)  the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B,
Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or
execute obligations to provide up to $10,000,000 for the acquisition of real
property or any interests in real property for state, county, or municipal
transportation corridors as provided in Section 72-2-117; and
(2)  revenues of the Transportation Corridor Preservation Revolving Loan Fund
be used as the primary revenue source for the repayment of any obligation
created under authority of this section.
